Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 4. Powers and Duties of Constables Transferred

§ 5-4-401.
Office of constable abolished; duties transferred to county sheriff;
process to be served by sheriff.

Upon the effective date
of this act, the office of constable shall be abolished in Wyoming,
and the functions, powers, and duties of the office of constable shall
be transferred to the office of county sheriff. All process shall
be served by the office of county sheriff.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 214, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.1.

§ 5-4-402.
Transfer of powers to county sheriff.

Wherever the word “constable”
appears in the Wyoming statutes, any power, duty, responsibility,
function, or jurisdiction of the constable shall be transferred to
the county sheriff.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 214, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.2.

Severability. —

Laws 1971, ch. 214, § 38, reads: “If any provision or clause of this act or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared severable.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1971, ch. 214, § 39, reads: “All acts and parts of acts inconsistent with this act are hereby repealed to the extent of such inconsistency.”